Washington statutes.
RCW 36.47.040

Reimbursement for costs and expenses to state association of county officials.

Each county which designates the Washington state association of county officials as the agency through which the duties imposed by RCW 36.47.020 may be executed is authorized to reimburse the association from the county current expense fund for the cost of any such services rendered: PROVIDED, That no reimbursement shall be made to the association for any expenses incurred under RCW 36.47.050 for travel, meals, or lodging of such county officials, or their representatives at such meetings, but such expenses may be paid by such official's respective county as other expenses are paid for county business. Such reimbursement shall be paid only on vouchers submitted to the county auditor and approved by the legislative authority of each county in the manner provided for the disbursement of other current expense funds. Each such voucher shall set forth the nature of the services rendered by the association, supported by affidavit that the services were actually performed.

[ 1991 c 363 s 71; 1977 ex.s. c 221 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 35; 1970 ex.s. c 47 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 5 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.47.040. Prior: 1959 c 130 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.